Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-189
Proof of ordinance; proof of adoption
and publication.

A
county ordinance may be proved by the certificate of the county clerk under
the seal of the county. The adoption and publication of the ordinance shall
be sufficiently proved by a certificate under the seal of the county, from
the county clerk, showing (1) that such ordinance was adopted and (2) when
and in what paper the ordinance was published or when, by whom, and where
the ordinance was posted.

Laws 2009, LB532, § 3.